California, session 20252026, AB1090.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11834.19 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:11834.19. (a) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services shall establish a pilot program to locate a Substance Use Disorder Compliance Division investigator within a participating county to investigate licensed adult alcoholism or drug abuse recovery or treatment facilities within that county. The participating county shall be the County of Orange, if the Orange County Board of Supervisors adopts an ordinance or resolution electing to participate in the pilot program.(2) The department shall implement the pilot program by executing a contract with the County of Orange that provides for all of the following:(A) The department shall assign a Substance Use Disorder Compliance Division investigator to investigate complaints against licensed adult alcoholism or drug abuse recovery or treatment facilities within the County of Orange.(B) The County of Orange shall reimburse the department for the costs associated with the pilot program, including, but not limited to, the administrative costs and the investigator’s compensation and benefits.(C) The County of Orange shall provide office space and amenities to the investigator.(b) The pilot program established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be completed no later than December 31, 2029.(c) If the County of Orange participates in the pilot program authorized by subdivision (a), it shall, no later than December 31, 2030, submit a report of the results of the pilot program to the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that includes both of the following:(1) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the pilot program.(2) Recommendations for subsequent actions.(d)  This section shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2034, and as of that date is repealed.SECTION 1.Section 1368.017 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1368.017.(a)(1)A health care service plan shall provide to enrollees a written or electronic notice regarding the benefits of a behavioral health and wellness screening for children and adolescents 8 to 18 years of age.(2)“Behavioral health and wellness screening” means a screening, test, or assessment to identify indicators or symptoms of behavioral health issues in an individual, including depression or anxiety.(b)The notice shall provide information regarding the benefits of behavioral health and wellness screenings for both depression and anxiety.(c)A health care service plan shall provide notice pursuant to this section annually.(d)This section does not apply to Medi-Cal managed care that contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services entered into pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.